Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000 of Title 43A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Contingent upon funding, the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services shall develop and implement rural mental
health and treatment diversion pilot programs. The purpose of the
rural mental health and treatment diversion pilot programs shall be
to divert individuals with mental health issues from the criminal
justice system and into appropriate treatment programs.


Req. No. 11715 Page 1

B. The Department is authorized to enter into contracts to
implement the rural mental health and treatment diversion pilot
programs of this section.
C. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
Board shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11715 TJ 01/05/25















Req. No. 11715 Page 2